Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0131, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Pharmaceutical marketing expenses. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical marketing" means advertising, marketing, or promotional activities directed toward consumers in the United States that are intended to promote the use, purchase, or prescription of a prescription drug or biologic, including television, radio, print, digital, and social media advertising, as well as patient-directed outreach and disease awareness campaigns funded by a pharmaceutical manufacturer and linked to a specific product; and new text end new text begin (2) "pharmaceutical manufacturer" means a person or entity engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, or processing of prescription drugs or biologics. new text end new text begin (b) The amount deducted under section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code for direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical marketing is an addition. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0133, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Pharmaceutical marketing expenses. new text end new text begin The amount deducted under section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code for direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical marketing is an addition. For purposes of this subdivision, "direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical marketing" has the meaning provided in section 290.0131, subdivision 21. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026. new text end